Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.151

Member-managed limited liability companies.

(1) If the limited liability company is member-managed:

(a) Management of the activities of the limited liability company is vested in the members; and

(b) A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the limited liability company may be decided by the vote, approval, or consent of a majority of the members, except as otherwise provided in RCW 25.15.121 or otherwise in this chapter.

(2) If the limited liability company is member-managed, each member is an agent of the limited liability company and has the authority to bind the limited liability company with regard to matters in the ordinary course of its activities.

[ 2015 c 188 s 31.]